Washington statutes.
RCW 36.120.100

Governing board—Organization.

The board shall adopt rules for the conduct of business. The board shall adopt bylaws to govern district affairs, which may include:

(1) The time and place of regular meetings;

(2) Rules for calling special meetings;

(3) The method of keeping records of proceedings and official acts;

(4) Procedures for the safekeeping and disbursement of funds; and

(5) Any other provisions the board finds necessary to include.

[ 2002 c 56 s 110.]